test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k46_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: fjørður
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: fjørð
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [firði, fjørði]
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: fjarðar
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: firðir
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: firðir
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [fjørðum, firðum]
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: fjarða
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: fjørðurin
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: fjørðin
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [firðinum, fjørðinum]
    fjørður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: fjarðarins
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: firðirnir
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: firðirnar
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [fjørðunum, firðunum]
    fjørður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: fjarðanna
